Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1117
Child with a disability, defined.

Child with a disability means a child having a disability listed in section 79-1118.01 and verified pursuant to sections 79-1137 to 79-1139.

Laws 1993, LB 520, § 24;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3306.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 799;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 11.